District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.47

Unbundling requirement.

The Mayor shall establish procedures to ensure that solicitations are subdivided and unbundled and that smaller contracts are created to the extent feasible and fiscally prudent.

History

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2347, 52 DCR 7503

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2347 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).